02_Morphology/excercise.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                   ! Nombre
%<cmp%>                 ! Composición

%>                      ! Frontera de morfema
%+                      ! Frontera de palabras compuestas (forma léxica)
%#                      ! Frontera de palabras compuestas (forma superficial)


LEXICON Root

Nouns  ;

LEXICON Cmp

%<cmp%>%+:%# Nouns ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>:%> Cmp ;
%<n%>: # ;

LEXICON Nouns

mapu:mapu N ; !"tierra, land"
che:che N ; ! "gente, people"
mamüll:mamüll N ; ! "madera, wood"
wangku:wangku N ; ! "silla, chair"

! hfst-lexc arn.lexc -o arn.lexc.hfst
! hfst-fst2txt arn.lexc.hfst | python3 att2dot.py  | dot -Tpng -o arn.lexc.png
